Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201548-669
Change in benefit amounts; when applicable.

Any change in the weekly benefit amounts prescribed in section 48-624 or any change in the maximum annual benefit amount prescribed in section 48-626 shall be applicable for the calendar year following the annual determination made pursuant to section 48-121.02.

Laws 1949, c. 163, § 18, p. 435;

Laws 1951, c. 157, § 2, p. 631;

Laws 1953, c. 168, § 2, p. 542;

Laws 1955, c. 190, § 11, p. 551;

Laws 1957, c. 209, § 3, p. 741;

Laws 1959, c. 229, § 3, p. 803;

Laws 1961, c. 235, § 4, p. 698;

Laws 1963, c. 291, § 4, p. 874;

Laws 1965, c. 286, § 2, p. 820;

Laws 1967, c. 299, § 2, p. 815;

Laws 1969, c. 401, § 2, p. 1394;

Laws 1971, LB 651, § 14;

Laws 1972, LB 1391, § 2;

Laws 1973, LB 333, § 2;

Laws 1974, LB 775, § 2;

Laws 1975, LB 475, § 2;

Laws 1977, LB 337, § 2;

Laws 1979, LB 183, § 2;

Laws 1983, LB 524, § 2;

Laws 1985, LB 216, § 2;

Laws 1987, LB 446, § 3;

Laws 1994, LB 286, § 4;

Laws 1998, LB 225, § 4;

Laws 2005, LB 739, § 13;

Laws 2015, LB271, § 11.